Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.110

Immunization program—Administrator's duties upon receipt of proof of immunization or certification of exemption.

A child's proof of immunization or certification of exemption shall be presented to the chief administrator of the public or private school or day care center or to his or her designee for that purpose. The chief administrator shall:

(1) Retain such records pertaining to each child at the school or day care center for at least the period the child is enrolled in the school or attends such center;

(2) Retain a record at the school or day care center of the name, address, and date of exclusion of each child excluded from school or the center pursuant to RCW 28A.210.120 for not less than three years following the date of a child's exclusion;

(3) File a written annual report with the department of health on the immunization status of students or children attending the day care center at a time and on forms prescribed by the department of health; and

(4) Allow agents of state and local health departments access to the records retained in accordance with this section during business hours for the purposes of inspection and copying.

[ 1991 c 3 s 291; 1990 c 33 s 195; 1979 ex.s. c 118 s 7. Formerly RCW 28A.31.112.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1979 ex.s. c 118: See notes following RCW 28A.210.060.